Hawaii statutes.
§507-44 Record in circuit courts. The
clerks at the circuit courts shall keep in their respective offices a book
called "Notice of completion record" in which shall be entered a
memorandum of each notice of completion filed and the date of filing, arranged
alphabetically in the names of the owners. There shall also be kept a
"mechanics' lien record" in which a memorandum of each Application
and Notice filed shall be entered, arranged alphabetically in the names of the
claimants and showing the amount of the lien or claim, the date of filing the
Application and Notice, the date of the entry of the Order Directing Lien To
Attach, the date of withdrawal, discharge or cancellation of the Application
and Notice or of a lien which has been directed to attach, and any other
matters deemed necessary. [L 1888, c 21, §3; RL 1925, §2893; RL 1935, §4367; RL
1945, §8771; am L 1949, c 241, §4; RL 1955, §193-43; HRS §507-44; am L 1975, c
181, §6]

Case Notes

Cited: 23 H. 744, 745.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next